Nevada, session 83, AB390.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Title 53 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new chapter to consist of the provisions set forth as
sections 2 to 38, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in sections 3 to 12,
inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed to them in those
sections.
-
*AB390*

– 4 –
Sec. 3. “Active task worker” means a task worker designated
by the Board as an active task worker who appears on the most
recent list of active task workers maintained by the Board
pursuant to section 17 of this act.
Sec. 4. “Bargaining unit” means a group of task workers
that the Board has established as a bargaining unit pursuant to
section 18 of this act.
Sec. 5. “Board” means the Labor Relations Board created by
NRS 288.080.
Sec. 6. 1. “Company union” means any committee,
employee representation plan, association of workers or other
organization having as one of its purposes the improvement of the
terms and conditions of work for task workers or the adjustment of
grievances of task workers with task delivery platform providers:
(a) That a provider has initiated or created or whose initiation
or creation was suggested or participated in by a provider;
(b) Whose governing rules, management, operations or
elections a provider has participated in; or
(c) That is controlled, dominated, maintained or financed, in
whole or in part, by a provider.
2. The term does not include a task worker organization that:
(a) Has negotiated or otherwise been granted the right to
designate task workers to be released with pay by a provider for
the purpose of providing representational services on behalf of
task workers represented by the task worker organization; or
(b) Is authorized by a provider to meet with task workers at the
premises of the provider in the course of providing
representational services on behalf of task workers represented by
the task worker organization.
Sec. 7. “Exclusive bargaining representative” means a task
worker organization that has been certified as the exclusive
bargaining representative of a bargaining unit pursuant to section
20 or 22 of this act.
Sec. 8. “Task” means a short-term job, project, assignment
or other piece of work:
1. That is performed by a task worker on-demand at the
request of a user through a task delivery platform; and
2. For which the task worker receives compensation through
the task delivery platform.
Sec. 9. “Task delivery platform” means an Internet website,
online service or mobile application that:
1. Connects users in need of the performance of a specific
task to a task worker who can perform the task; and
2. Uses algorithms or automated systems to:
(a) Connect users with task workers;
-
*AB390*

– 5 –
(b) Determine the rate of pay for a task worker for the
performance of a specific task through the platform; and
(c) Evaluate the performance of a task worker.
Sec. 10. “Task delivery platform provider” or “provider”
means a person who operates a task delivery platform.
Sec. 11. “Task worker” means a natural person who has
entered into a contract with a task delivery platform provider to
receive connections to users in need of the performance of a
specific task through the task delivery platform of the provider.
The term does not include a person who is an employee, as defined
in 29 U.S.C. § 152(3).
Sec. 12. “Task worker organization” means an organization
of any kind, other than a company union, having as one of its
purposes the improvement of the terms and conditions of work for
task workers or the adjustment of grievances of task workers with
task delivery platform providers.
Sec. 13. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
1. Task workers have become a prevalent and important part
of the economy of this State.
2. Task workers often suffer from inadequate pay and
benefits, as well as irregular or inadequate working hours.
3. It is in the best interest of the State to provide task workers
the opportunity to self-organize, designate representatives of their
own choosing and to bargain collectively to obtain sustainable
compensation, benefits and working conditions, subject to the
approval and ongoing supervision of the State.
4. It is the policy of this State to exempt activities authorized
pursuant to sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act, including,
without limitation, the formation of task worker organizations and
industry associations for the purpose of collective bargaining
between task workers and task delivery platform providers on an
industry-wide basis, that might otherwise be constrained by State
antitrust laws from such laws and to provide immunity for such
activities from federal antitrust laws through the state action
immunity doctrine.
Sec. 14. 1. Task workers have the right to:
(a) Organize, form, join or assist task worker organizations,
engage in collective bargaining through exclusive bargaining
representatives and engage in other concerted activities; and
(b) Refrain from engaging in such activity.
2. Collective bargaining entails a mutual obligation of a task
delivery platform provider and an exclusive bargaining
representative to meet at reasonable times and to bargain in good
faith with respect to compensation, hours, procedures for the
adjustment of grievances and other terms and conditions of work
-
*AB390*

– 6 –
in an attempt to reach a recommended agreement to be submitted
to the Labor Commissioner pursuant to section 32 of this act.
3. In addition to any other information required pursuant to
sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act, a task worker shall furnish
to an exclusive bargaining representative data that is maintained
in the ordinary course of business and which is relevant to the
subjects described in subsection 2. This subsection shall not be
construed to require a provider to furnish to the exclusive
bargaining representative any advice or training received by
representatives of the provider concerning collective bargaining.
4. Nothing in the provisions of sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of
this act prohibit a task worker from conferring with a task delivery
platform provider at any time concerning any matter, so long as
such a conference does not involve an attempt by the provider to
interfere with or restrain the exercise of any right granted by
sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 15. 1. It is a prohibited practice for a task delivery
platform provider to:
(a) Fail or refuse to provide the Board, an exclusive
bargaining representative or other task worker organization any
information required by sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
(b) Refuse to collectively bargain in good faith concerning the
subjects described in subsection 2 of section 14 of this act.
(c) Engage in a lockout of task workers.
(d) Conduct surveillance, directly or through another person,
of a task worker or a task worker organization concerning
activities of such persons in the exercise of the rights granted by
sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
(e) Except as otherwise required or authorized by the
provisions of sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act or any
regulation adopted pursuant thereto, interfere with the formation,
existence or administration of any task worker organization,
including, without limitation, by:
(1) Contributing money or other support to any task worker
organization.
(2) Participating in, assisting, supervising or controlling;
(I) The initiation or creation of any task worker
organization; or
(II) The meetings, management, operation, elections,
formulation or amendment of the constitution, rules or policies of
any such organization.
(3) Offering incentives to task workers to join any task
worker organization.
(4) Donating free services, materials, office or meeting
space or anything else of value for use by any task worker
-
*AB390*

– 7 –
organization, except that provisions of this subparagraph do not
prohibit a provider from allowing:
(I) A task worker to perform work relating to the rights
granted by sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act during working
hours without loss of time or pay; or
(II) An agent of an exclusive bargaining representative
to meet with task workers in the bargaining unit represented by
the representative at the premises of the provider.
(f) Require a task worker to join any company union or task
worker organization.
(g) Require a task worker to refrain from forming, joining or
assisting a task worker organization of his or her own choosing.
(h) Encourage membership in a company union or discourage
membership in a task worker organization by discrimination with
respect to the hiring or in any term or condition of work.
(i) Discharge or otherwise discriminate against a task worker
because the task worker has signed or filed any affidavit, petition
or complaint or given any information or testimony pursuant to
sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
(j) Distribute or circulate any blacklist of persons exercising
any right granted by sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act or of
the members of a task worker organization, or inform any person
of the exercise by any person of such a right or of the membership
of any person in a task worker organization for the purpose of
preventing persons so blacklisted or so named from obtaining or
retaining opportunities for remuneration.
(k) Take any other action which interferes with, restrains or
coerces task workers in the exercise of any right granted by
sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
2. It is a prohibited practice for a task worker organization to:
(a) Refuse to collectively bargain in good faith with a task
delivery platform provider if the task worker organization is the
exclusive bargaining representative for any task workers within
the bargaining unit represented by the representative who have
contracted with the provider.
(b) Refuse to provide the Board or a provider any information
required by sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
(c) Restrain or coerce any task worker in the exercise of any
right granted by sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act. Nothing in
this paragraph prohibits a task worker organization from
establishing internal rules governing the acquisition and retention
of membership in the organization.
(d) Fail to fairly represent any task worker who the
organization represents as an exclusive bargaining representative
-
*AB390*

– 8 –
by acts or omissions that are arbitrary, discriminatory or in bad
faith.
(e) Restrain or coerce a provider in the selection of any
representative for the purpose of collective bargaining or the
adjustment of grievances.
3. As used in this section, “lockout” means the refusal of a
provider to allow a task worker normal access to the task delivery
platform of the provider because of a dispute with task workers
concerning the subjects described in subsection 2 of section 14 of
this act. The term does not include the removal of a task worker
from the task delivery platform of a provider for any reason other
than for the exercise of any right granted by sections 13 to 35,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 16. 1. To establish that a party committed a prohibited
practice in violation of section 15 of this act, the party aggrieved
by the practice must file a complaint with the Board in accordance
with the procedures prescribed by the Board. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection 2, the provisions of NRS 288.625 and
288.630 apply to a complaint filed pursuant to this section.
2. The affirmative relief that the Board may order pursuant
to paragraph (b) of subsection 3 of NRS 288.625 or paragraph (b)
of subsection 4 of NRS 288.630 concerning a complaint filed
pursuant to this section includes, without limitation:
(a) The withdrawal of recognition of a task worker
organization or decertification of a task worker organization as an
exclusive bargaining representative;
(b) The awarding of back pay or other restoration of
compensation to a task worker, without any reduction based on
the interim earnings of the task worker or the failure of the task
worker to earn interim earnings, consequential damages and an
additional amount as liquidated damages equal to two times the
amount of damages awarded;
(c) Requiring a provider to restore a task worker to the task
delivery platform of the provider;
(d) Requiring a provider or task worker organization to
provide specified information to a complainant; and
(e) Requiring a provider or task worker organization to engage
in collective bargaining as required pursuant to sections 13 to 35,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 17. 1. Not later than 14 days after the end of each
calendar quarter, each task delivery platform provider shall
provide to the Board a report that identifies each task worker who
has contracted with the provider and completed five or more tasks
in this State through the task delivery platform of the provider in
the immediately preceding 6 months. The report must include,
-
*AB390*

– 9 –
without limitation, the name, phone number, mailing address and
electronic mail address of each such task worker.
2. The Board shall determine the median amount of tasks
completed by task workers for all providers in this State in the
immediately preceding 6 months based on the report submitted
pursuant to subsection 1. The Board shall designate any task
worker who completed more than the median amount of tasks
during that period as an active task worker. The Board shall
maintain and update after each calendar quarter a list of each
active task worker.
Sec. 18. The Board shall establish by regulation industry-
wide bargaining units for task workers consisting of groups of task
workers who have a sufficient community of interest appropriate
for representation by a task worker organization for the purpose of
collective bargaining.
Sec. 19. 1. A task worker organization may submit a
request to the Board to be designated as a recognized bargaining
representative of a bargaining unit.
2. A request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
accompanied by evidence sufficient to show that at least 5 percent
of the active task workers within the bargaining unit have
authorized the task worker organization to act as the exclusive
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit. Such evidence
may include, without limitation, cards, petitions or other evidence
determined to be sufficient by the Board. Any such evidence must
contain the signature of the task worker, which may be in
electronic form, and must have been executed not more than 1
year before the date the evidence is submitted to the Board.
3. If the Board determines that the task worker organization
that submitted a request pursuant to subsection 1 has been
authorized by at least 5 percent of the active task workers within a
bargaining unit to act as the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit, the Board shall:
(a) Designate the task worker organization as a recognized
bargaining representative for the bargaining unit;
(b) Order each provider who has contracted with a task worker
within the bargaining unit to send a notice, in a form prescribed
by the Board, to each such task worker indicating that the task
worker organization seeks to represent the task worker; and
(c) Provide the task worker organization with a complete list of
each active task worker in the bargaining unit that includes,
without limitation, the name, phone number, mailing address and
electronic mail address for each task worker. For 1 year after the
date on which the Board designates the task worker organization
as a recognized bargaining representative, the Board shall provide
-
*AB390*

– 10 –
to the task worker organization an updated list following each
calendar quarter.
4. For 6 months after the date on which the Board designates
the task worker organization as a recognized bargaining
representative, the Board shall not certify any task worker
organization other than the task worker organization so
designated as the exclusive bargaining representative of the
bargaining unit without an election ordered by the Board
pursuant to section 20 or 21 of this act.
Sec. 20. 1. A task worker organization that wishes to be
certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit must submit to the Board a request for
certification.
2. A request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
accompanied by:
(a) Evidence of the type described in subsection 2 of section 19
of this act sufficient to show that at least 25 percent of the active
task workers within the bargaining unit have authorized the task
worker organization to serve as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit; or
(b) Both:
(1) Evidence of the type described in subsection 2 of section
19 of this act sufficient to show that at least 5 percent of the active
task workers within the bargaining unit have authorized the task
worker organization to serve as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit; and
(2) A request to conduct an election among task workers
within the bargaining unit.
3. Except as otherwise provided in section 19 of this act, if the
Board determines that a task worker organization that submitted a
request pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2 has been
authorized by:
(a) At least 25 percent but not more than 50 percent of the
active task workers within a bargaining unit to act as the exclusive
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit, the Board shall
certify the task worker organization as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit 7 days after the
determination is made, unless, during the 7-day period, the
certification is challenged in accordance with section 21 of this
act.
(b) More than 50 percent of the active task workers within a
bargaining unit to act as the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit, certify the task worker organization as the
exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit.
-
*AB390*

– 11 –
4. If the Board determines that a task worker organization
that submitted a request pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2
has been authorized by at least 5 percent of the active task workers
within a bargaining unit to act as the exclusive bargaining
representative of the bargaining unit, the Board shall order an
election to be conducted among the active task workers in the
bargaining unit. The election must be conducted in accordance
with section 22 of this act and any procedures and requirements
established by the Board by regulation.
Sec. 21. 1. A task worker organization or task delivery
platform provider may challenge the certification of a task worker
organization described in paragraph (a) of subsection 3 of section
20 of this act as the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit if, during the 7-day period described in paragraph
(a) of subsection 3 of section 20 of this act, the task worker
organization or provider submits to the Board:
(a) For a task worker organization, evidence of the type
described in subsection 2 of section 19 of this act sufficient to
show that at least 25 percent of the active task workers within the
bargaining unit have authorized the task worker organization to
serve as the exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining
unit.
(b) For a provider, evidence sufficient to show that at least 25
percent of the active task workers within the bargaining unit do
not wish to be represented by any task worker organization.
2. If the Board determines that a task worker organization or
provider has submitted the evidence required by subsection 1, the
Board shall order an election to be conducted among the active
task workers within the bargaining unit. The election must be
conducted in accordance with section 22 of this act and any
procedures and requirements established by the Board by
regulation.
Sec. 22. 1. If the Board orders an election within a
bargaining unit pursuant to section 20 or 21 of this act, the Board
shall order that each of the following be placed as a choice on the
ballot for the election:
(a) If applicable, the task worker organization certified as the
exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit;
(b) If applicable, the task worker organization requesting
certification as the exclusive bargaining representative of the
bargaining unit pursuant to section 20 of this act;
(c) If applicable, the task worker organization challenging the
certification pursuant to section 21 of this act; and
(d) A choice for “no representation.”
-
*AB390*

– 12 –
2. If a ballot for an election contains more than two choices
and none of the choices on the ballot receives a majority of the
votes cast at the initial election, the Board shall order a runoff
election between the two choices on the ballot that received the
highest number of votes at the initial election.
3. If the choice for “no representation” receives a majority of
the votes cast at the election, the Board shall designate the
bargaining unit as being without representation.
4. If a task worker organization receives a majority of the
votes cast as the initial election or at any runoff election, the
Board shall certify the task worker organization as the exclusive
bargaining representative of the bargaining unit.
Sec. 23. 1. A task worker organization that has been
certified as the exclusive bargaining representative of a
bargaining unit remains the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit until replaced or decertified.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, an exclusive
bargaining representative may be replaced by another task worker
organization who submits a request for certification in accordance
with the procedures set forth in section 20 of this act.
3. A provider or group of task workers may submit to the
Board a request for the decertification of an exclusive bargaining
representative. Such a request must be accompanied by evidence
sufficient to show that at least 25 percent of active task workers
within the bargaining unit do not wish to be represented by any
task worker organization. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 4, if the Board determines that a task worker
organization or provider has submitted such evidence, the Board
shall order an election to be conducted among the active task
workers within the bargaining unit. The election must be
conducted in accordance with section 22 of this act and any
procedures and requirements established by regulation of the
Board.
4. Except as otherwise provided in section 29 of this act, an
exclusive bargaining representative is not subject to replacement
or decertification for the greater of:
(a) One year after the date upon which the task worker
organization is certified as the exclusive bargaining representative
of the bargaining unit; or
(b) The period in which an agreement or decision approved by
the Labor Commissioner pursuant to section 32 of this act is
effective.
Sec. 24. An exclusive bargaining representative has the
exclusive right to engage in collective bargaining with providers
who have contracted with task workers within the bargaining unit
-
*AB390*

– 13 –
represented by the exclusive bargaining representative for a
recommended agreement concerning compensation, benefits,
procedures for the adjustment of grievances and other terms and
conditions of work for task workers within the bargaining unit.
Sec. 25. 1. An exclusive bargaining representative may
submit to a provider a request signed by a task worker within the
bargaining unit represented by the representative to deduct from
the compensation due to the task worker an amount of money
specified by the request and provide the money to the exclusive
bargaining representative for membership dues.
2. A provider that receives a request submitted pursuant to
subsection 1 shall commence making the required deductions and
provide the money to the exclusive bargaining representative as
soon as practicable, but in no case later than 30 days after the
receipt of the request.
3. A provider shall not honor any request for deductions
submitted by a task worker organization for a task worker within a
bargaining unit other than the exclusive bargaining representative
that represents the bargaining unit.
4. A request submitted pursuant to subsection 1 remains in
effect until a task worker revokes his or her membership in the
exclusive bargaining representative in accordance with the terms
set forth in the request.
Sec. 26. 1. To commence the collective bargaining process,
an exclusive bargaining representative shall provide written notice
to the Board. Upon receipt of such notice, the Board shall notify
each provider who has contracted with a task worker within the
bargaining unit represented by the representative.
2. The exclusive bargaining representative and each provider
notified pursuant to subsection 1 shall promptly commence
negotiations to reach a recommended agreement concerning
compensation, benefits, procedures for the adjustment of
grievances and other terms and conditions of work. Such terms
and conditions must include, without limitation:
(a) The circumstances under which a task worker may be
removed from the task delivery platform of a provider; and
(b) Procedures for resolving a claim that alleges that a task
worker was unjustifiably removed from the task delivery platform
of a provider.
3. To facilitate the negotiations required by subsection 2, the
providers subject to the negotiations may form an industry
association and designate that association to negotiate on behalf
of the providers.
Sec. 27. 1. Any recommended agreement resulting from
negotiations required by section 26 of this act must be approved by
-
*AB390*

– 14 –
the providers and exclusive bargaining representatives subject to
the negotiations.
2. For the purposes of subsection 1, a recommended
agreement shall be deemed to be approved by the providers subject
to the negotiations if the recommended agreement is approved by:
(a) If the negotiations involve a single provider, the provider.
(b) If the negotiations involve multiple providers and the
providers have formed an industry association pursuant to section
26 of this act, the industry association.
(c) If the negotiations involve multiple providers and the
providers have not formed an industry association pursuant to
section 26 of this act:
(1) At least two of the providers; and
(2) A combination of the providers whose combined market
share represents at least 80 percent of the total market for the task
workers within the bargaining unit.
 For the purpose of complying with this paragraph, each of the
providers is entitled to a number of votes for approval or
disapproval that is proportional to the number of tasks completed
by task workers who have contracted with the provider in the 2
immediately preceding calendar quarters.
3. For the purposes of subsection 1, a recommended
agreement shall be deemed to be approved by an exclusive
bargaining representative if an election concerning whether to
approve the recommended agreement is held among all task
workers within the bargaining unit who have completed at least
100 tasks in the immediately preceding calendar quarter and the
approval receives a majority of the votes cast in the election.
4. A recommended agreement that has been approved
pursuant to subsection 1 must be submitted to the Labor
Commissioner as soon as practicable after approval.
Sec. 28. 1. If the providers and the exclusive bargaining
representative have failed to reach a recommended agreement not
less than 180 days after the date on which the exclusive
bargaining representative submitted the notice to the Board
pursuant to section 26 of this act, any party may declare the
negotiations to be at an impasse by providing notice to the Board.
2. Upon receipt of a notice pursuant to subsection 1, the
Board shall provide notice to the parties. The parties may, within 7
days after receipt of the notice, mutually agree upon the selection
of a mediator. If the parties are unable to agree on the selection of
a mediator within that period, the Board shall submit to the parties
a list of potential mediators. Within 5 days after receipt of the list:
(a) The providers subject to the negotiations shall select one
person to serve as a representative of all the providers;
-
*AB390*

– 15 –
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative shall select one
person to serve as a representative of the exclusive bargaining
representative; and
(c) The representatives selected pursuant to paragraphs (a)
and (b) shall select the mediator from the list by alternatively
striking one name until the name of only one mediator remains,
who will be the mediator to hear the dispute. The representatives
shall draw lots to determine which representative strikes the first
name.
3. If the parties fail to select representatives and select a
mediator pursuant to subsection 2 within 5 days after receipt of
the list of potential mediators, the Board shall select a mediator to
hear the dispute in question.
4. The mediator selected pursuant to subsection 2 shall bring
the parties together as soon as possible and attempt to settle the
dispute within 30 days after being notified of the mediator’s
selection as mediator.
Sec. 29. 1. If the parties are unable to reach a
recommended agreement within 30 days after the date on which
the mediator is notified of being selected, any party may submit a
request to the Board to refer the dispute to an arbitrator.
2. Upon receipt of a request submitted pursuant to subsection
1, the Board shall order an election to be conducted among all
task workers in the bargaining unit represented by the exclusive
bargaining representative who have completed at least 100 tasks in
the immediately preceding calendar quarter. At the election, the
Board shall order that each of the following be placed as a choice
on the ballot for the election:
(a) A choice to submit the dispute to arbitration; and
(b) A choice to decertify the task worker organization as the
exclusive bargaining representative for the bargaining unit.
3. If the choice to submit the dispute to arbitration receives a
majority of the votes cast at the election, the Board shall order an
arbitrator to be selected in accordance with section 30 of this act.
4. If the choice to submit to decertify the task worker
organization as the exclusive bargaining representative of the
bargaining unit receives a majority of the votes cast at the
election:
(a) The task worker organization shall no longer be deemed to
be the exclusive bargaining representative of the bargaining unit;
(b) The Board shall designate the bargaining unit as being
without representation; and
(c) Any existing agreement or decision approved by the Labor
Commissioner pursuant to section 32 of this act remains valid
until the expiration of the agreement.
-
*AB390*

– 16 –
Sec. 30. 1. If the Board orders an arbitrator to be selected
pursuant to section 29 of this act, the Board shall provide notice to
the parties. The parties may, within 7 days after receipt of the
notice, mutually agree upon the selection of an arbitrator. If the
parties are unable to agree on the selection of an arbitrator within
that period, the Board shall submit to the parties a list of potential
arbitrators. Within 5 days after receipt of the list:
(a) The providers subject to the negotiations shall select one
person to serve as a representative of all the providers;
(b) The exclusive bargaining representative shall select one
person to serve as a representative of the exclusive bargaining
representative; and
(c) The representatives selected pursuant to paragraphs (a)
and (b) shall select the arbitrator from the list by alternatively
striking one name until the name of only one arbitrator remains,
who will be the arbitrator to hear the dispute. The representatives
shall draw lots to determine which representative strikes the first
name.
2. If the parties fail to select representatives and select an
arbitrator pursuant to subsection 1 within 5 days after receipt of
the list of potential arbitrators, the Board shall select an arbitrator
to hear the dispute in question.
Sec. 31. 1. The arbitrator selected pursuant to section 30 of
this act shall hold one or more hearings to receive information
concerning the dispute. Each such hearing must be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of this section and any other
procedures and requirements established by the arbitrator.
2. At each hearing conducted pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) Each party may appear in person or by counsel or other
representative designated by the party.
(b) Each party who is a provider who has contracted with at
least 50 task workers in the bargaining unit in the immediately
preceding calendar quarter and the exclusive bargaining
representative may present, orally, in writing or both, statements
of fact, supporting witnesses and other evidence and argument of
their respective positions.
(c) Each party who is a provider who has contracted with less
than 50 task workers in the bargaining unit in the immediately
preceding calendar quarter may submit written evidence to the
arbitrator.
(d) The arbitrator may administer oaths or affirmations, take
testimony and issue and seek enforcement of a subpoena in the
same manner as the Board pursuant to NRS 288.120 and, except
as otherwise provided in subsection 5, the provisions of NRS
288.120 apply to any subpoena issued by the arbitrator.
-
*AB390*

– 17 –
(e) At the request of a party, a full and complete record of the
hearing must be kept. The party requesting the record shall pay
any costs associated with the keeping of the record. The record
must be provided to all parties.
3. After the conclusion of the final hearing conducted
pursuant to subsection 1, the arbitrator shall render a decision
and report the decision to the parties. The decision must be in
writing and include a statement specifying the reasons for the
decision. In rendering the decision, the arbitrator shall consider
the following criteria, as applicable:
(a) Whether the amount of compensation and benefits under
consideration:
(1) Is sufficient compared to the cost of living; and
(2) Would allow a task worker who performs a sufficient
number of tasks to support himself or herself without relying on
any form of public assistance.
(b) Whether the mechanisms under consideration to deliver
benefits to task workers are the most efficient means by which to
provide such benefits.
(c) The financial ability of the providers to pay for
compensation and benefits and the effect of such payments on the
ability of providers to provide services through their task delivery
platforms.
(d) Whether the mechanisms under consideration for the
adjustment of grievances allow task workers a reasonable
expectation of uninterrupted work and allow the providers to alter
or terminate relationships with task workers if there is cause for
such termination.
(e) Whether the compensation, benefits, terms and conditions
of work are sufficient as compared to persons performing similar
activities as part of the profession or occupation of the person.
4. A decision rendered pursuant to subsection 3 must be
submitted to the Labor Commissioner as soon as practicable after
it is rendered.
5. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e) of
subsection 2, the providers subject to the negotiations and the
exclusive bargaining representative shall each pay one-half of the
cost of arbitration.
Sec. 32. 1. A recommended agreement approved pursuant
to section 27 of this act or a decision rendered pursuant to section
31 of this act does not become effective until approved by the
Labor Commissioner pursuant to this section.
2. The Labor Commissioner shall, for 30 days after the
receipt of a recommended agreement or decision, allow the parties
-
*AB390*

– 18 –
and affected task workers to submit written comments concerning
the agreement or decision.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, not later
than 60 days after the conclusion of the 30-day period described in
subsection 2, the Labor Commissioner shall:
(a) Approve the recommended agreement or decision without
modification;
(b) Approve the recommended agreement or decision with
such modifications as the Labor Commissioner deems necessary;
or
(c) Reject the recommended agreement or decision.
4. If the Labor Commissioner intends to impose
modifications pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 3, the
Labor Commissioner shall provide notice to the parties and allow
the parties and affected task workers, for 30 days after the date on
which the notice is sent, to submit written comments concerning
the proposed modifications.
5. In determining whether to approve, with or without
modification, or reject a recommended agreement or decision
pursuant to subsection 3, the Labor Commissioner shall consider
the criteria set forth in subsection 3 of section 31 of this act.
6. If the Labor Commissioner approves an agreement or
decision pursuant to paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 3, the
Labor Commissioner shall provide written notice of the approval
to the parties. The notice must include a date established by the
Labor Commissioner on which the agreement or decision becomes
effective and expires. The expiration date must be not more than 3
years after the date on which the agreement or decision becomes
effective. An approved agreement or decision becomes binding on
the parties on the effective date set forth in the notice and expires
on the expiration date set forth in the notice.
7. The Labor Commissioner shall continuously monitor
market conditions during any period in which an agreement or
decision is effective pursuant to subsection 6. If the Labor
Commissioner determines that market conditions require
modification of the agreement or decision, the Labor
Commissioner may modify the agreement or decision after
providing notice to the parties and allowing the parties and
affected task workers to submit written comments for 30 days after
the date on which the notice is sent. A modification made pursuant
to this subsection does not affect the effective date or expiration
date of the agreement or decision.
Sec. 33. An agreement or decision approved by the Labor
Commissioner pursuant to section 32 of this act does not preempt
or supersede any statute or regulation setting forth labor
-
*AB390*

– 19 –
standards that provide greater benefits or protections to a task
worker.
Sec. 34. A person aggrieved by a determination by the Board
pursuant to section 19, 20, 21 or 23 of this act, or a decision of the
Labor Commissioner pursuant to section 32 of this act, is entitled
to judicial review. A judicial review authorized pursuant to this
subsection must be limited to a determination of whether the
determination or decision was arbitrary, capricious or otherwise
characterized by an abuse of discretion and must be conducted in
accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 233B of NRS
for reviewing a final decision of an agency.
Sec. 35. The Board and the Labor Commissioner may adopt
any regulations necessary to carry out their respective duties set
forth in sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 36. 1. In addition to any other requirements set forth
by specific statute, a task delivery platform provider shall, for each
task completed for a user through the task delivery platform of the
provider, disclose to the user in plain language and in a
conspicuous manner:
(a) The total cost to the user for the completion of the task by
the task worker; and
(b) Each portion of the total cost described in paragraph (a)
that is provided to:
(1) The task worker who completed the task; and
(2) The provider.
2. A provider shall regularly provide to each task worker with
whom the provider has contracted a report that details the
compensation paid to the task worker for the completion of tasks
through the task delivery platform and any deductions from that
compensation made by the provider.
Sec. 37. 1. A task delivery platform provider shall ensure
that a task worker with whom the provider has contracted and who
performs tasks through the task delivery platform of the provider
is paid for each hour the task worker works in performing such
tasks an amount that is not less than the minimum wage set forth
in NRS 608.250.
2. If a task delivery platform provider violates the provisions
of subsection 1, the task worker may, at any time within 2 years,
bring a civil action against the employer.
3. If the task worker prevails in a civil action brought
pursuant to subsection 2:
(a) The task worker is entitled to all remedies available under
the law or in equity appropriate to remedy the violation by the
provider which may include, without limitation, back pay,
damages, reinstatement or injunctive relief; and
-
*AB390*

– 20 –
(b) The court must award the task worker reasonable
attorney’s fees and costs.
Sec. 38. 1. A contract between a task worker and a task
delivery platform provider to allow the task worker to receive
connections to users in need of the performance of a specific task
through the task delivery platform of the provider must:
(a) Be written in a clear and comprehensible language that is
understandable to an ordinary layperson.
(b) Contain clear, conspicuous and accurate details of:
(1) The rates of pay provided to the task worker for the
performance of tasks through the platform;
(2) Any fees charged by the provider to the task worker;
(3) The conditions under which the task worker may be
removed from the platform; and
(4) The procedures for the resolution of disputes.
(c) Not be in a form which requires the task worker to manifest
his or her assent to the contract by clicking a button or pop-up
window that reads “ok” or “agree” or conveys a similar message.
2. A provider shall not engage in any practice with respect to
a contract described in subsection 1 that is deceptive or that
encourages misrepresentation or misunderstanding of the
contract.
Sec. 39. NRS 608.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.270 1. The Labor Commissioner shall:
(a) Administer and enforce the provisions of NRS 608.250 and
608.670 [;] and section 37 of this act;
(b) Adopt any regulations necessary to carry out the duties set
forth in paragraph (a); and
(c) Furnish the district attorney of any county or the Attorney
General all data and information concerning violations of the
provisions of NRS 608.250 or 608.670 [,] or section 37 of this act
occurring in the county coming to the attention of the Labor
Commissioner.
2. Each district attorney shall, if a complaint is made to him or
her by the Labor Commissioner or by any aggrieved person,
prosecute each violation of the provisions of NRS 608.250 or
608.670 or section 37 of this act that occurs in the district attorney’s
county. If any such district attorney fails, neglects or refuses for 20
days to commence a prosecution for a violation of the provisions of
NRS 608.250 or 608.670 [,] or section 37 of this act, after being
furnished data and information concerning the violation, and
diligently to prosecute the same to conclusion, the district attorney is
guilty of a misdemeanor, and in addition thereto must be removed
from office.
-
*AB390*

– 21 –
Sec. 40. NRS 608.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
608.290 1. Any person who violates any provision of NRS
608.250 or 608.670 or section 37 of this act or any regulation
adopted pursuant thereto is guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. In addition to any other remedy or penalty, the Labor
Commissioner may impose against the person an administrative
penalty of not more than $5,000 for each such violation.
Sec. 41. NRS 281.755 is hereby amended to read as follows:
281.755 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
5, a public body shall provide an employee who is the mother of a
child under 1 year of age with:
(a) Reasonable break time, with or without compensation, for
the employee to express breast milk as needed; and
(b) A place, other than a bathroom, that is reasonably free from
dirt or pollution, protected from the view of others and free from
intrusion by others where the employee may express breast milk.
2. If the public body determines that complying with the
provisions of subsection 1 will cause an undue hardship considering
the size, financial resources, nature and structure of the public body,
the public body may meet with the employee to agree upon a
reasonable alternative. If the parties are not able to reach an
agreement, the public body may require the employee to accept a
reasonable alternative selected by the public body and the employee
may appeal the decision by filing a complaint in the manner set
forth in subsection 4.
3. An officer or agent of a public body shall not retaliate, or
direct or encourage another person to retaliate, against an employee
of the public body because the employee has:
(a) Taken break time or used the space provided pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2 to express breast milk; or
(b) Taken any action to require the public body to comply with
the requirements of this section, including, without limitation, filing
a complaint, testifying, assisting or participating in any manner in an
investigation, proceeding or hearing to enforce the provisions of this
section.
4. An employee who is aggrieved by the failure of a public
body to comply with the provisions of this section may:
(a) If the employee is employed by the Executive Department of
State Government, is not an employee of an entity described in NRS
284.013 and is not an employee in a bargaining unit pursuant to
NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, file a complaint with the
Employee-Management Committee in accordance with the
procedures provided pursuant to NRS 284.384;
-
*AB390*

– 22 –
(b) If the employee is employed by the Legislative Department
of State Government, file a complaint with the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau;
(c) If the employee is employed by the Judicial Department of
State Government, file a complaint with the Court Administrator;
and
(d) If the employee is employed by a political subdivision of this
State or any public or quasi-public corporation organized under the
laws of this State or if the employee is employed by the Executive
Department of State Government and is an employee in a bargaining
unit pursuant to NRS 288.400 to 288.630, inclusive, file a complaint
with the [Government Employee-Management] Labor Relations
Board in the manner set forth in NRS 288.115.
5. The requirements of this section do not apply to the
Department of Corrections. The Department is encouraged to
comply with the provisions of this section to the extent practicable.
6. As used in this section, “public body” means:
(a) The State of Nevada, or any agency, instrumentality or
corporation thereof;
(b) The Nevada System of Higher Education; or
(c) Any political subdivision of this State or any public or quasi-
public corporation organized under the laws of this State, including,
without limitation, counties, cities, unincorporated towns, school
districts, charter schools, hospital districts, irrigation districts and
other special districts.
Sec. 42. Chapter 288 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 43 to 46, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 43. “Exclusive bargaining representative” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 44. “Task delivery platform provider” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 10 of this act.
Sec. 45. “Task worker” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 11 of this act.
Sec. 46. “Task worker organization” has the meaning
ascribed to it in section 12 of this act.
Sec. 47. NRS 288.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.015 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 288.029 to 288.074,
inclusive, and sections 43 to 46, inclusive, of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 48. NRS 288.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.029 “Board” means the [Government Employee-
Management] Labor Relations Board created by NRS 288.080.
-
*AB390*

– 23 –
Sec. 49. NRS 288.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.080 1. The [Government Employee-Management] Labor
Relations Board is hereby created, consisting of five members,
broadly representative of the public and not closely allied with any
employee organization, any labor organization, task worker
organization, the Executive Department , [or] any local government
employer [.] or any task delivery platform provider.
2. Not more than three of the members of the Board may be
members of the same political party, and at least three of the
members must reside in southern Nevada. The term of office of each
member is 4 years.
3. The Governor shall appoint the members of the Board.
Sec. 50. NRS 288.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
288.110 1. The Board may make rules governing:
(a) Proceedings before it;
(b) Procedures for fact-finding;
(c) The recognition, as defined in NRS 288.136, of employee
organizations;
(d) The designation of the exclusive representative of a
bargaining unit in accordance with the provisions of NRS 288.520,
288.525 and 288.530; [and]
(e) The designation of a task worker organization as the
exclusive bargaining representative of a bargaining unit in
accordance with the provisions of sections 20, 21 and 22 of this
act; and
(f) The determination of bargaining units.
2. The Board may hear and determine any complaint arising
out of the interpretation of, or performance under, the provisions of
[this] :
(a) This chapter by the Executive Department, any local
government employer, any employee, as defined in NRS 288.425,
any local government employee, any employee organization or any
labor organization.
(b) Sections 13 to 35, inclusive, of this act by any task delivery
platform provider, any task worker or any task worker
organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection and NRS
288.115, 288.280 and 288.625, the Board shall conduct a hearing
pursuant to subsection 2 within 180 days after it decides to hear a
complaint. If a complaint alleges a violation of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 288.620 or paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of
NRS 288.620, the Board shall conduct a hearing not later than 45
days after it decides to hear the complaint, unless the parties agree to
waive this requirement. The Board, after a hearing, if it finds that
the complaint is well taken, may order any person or entity to refrain
-
*AB390*

– 24 –
from the action complained of or to restore to the party aggrieved
any benefit of which the party has been deprived by that action.
Except when an expedited hearing is conducted pursuant to NRS
288.115, the Board shall issue its decision within 120 days after the
hearing on the complaint is completed.
[3.] 4. Any party aggrieved by the failure of any person to
obey an order of the Board issued pursuant to subsection [2,] 3, or
the Board at the request of such a party, may apply to a court of
competent jurisdiction for a prohibitory or mandatory injunction to
enforce the order.
[4.] 5. The Board may not consider any complaint or appeal
filed more than 6 months after the occurrence which is the subject of
the complaint or appeal.
[5.] 6. The Board may decide without a hearing a contested
matter:
(a) In which all of the legal issues have been previously decided
by the Board, if it adopts its previous decision or decisions as
precedent; or
(b) Upon agreement of all the parties.
[6.] 7. The Board may award reasonable costs, which may
include attorneys’ fees, to the prevailing party.
[7.] 8. As used in this section, “bargaining unit” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 288.134 or 288.415 [.] or section 4 of
this act.
Sec. 51. NRS 598A.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
598A.040 The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
1. Any labor, agricultural or horticultural organizations
organized for the purpose of self-help and not for profit to itself nor
to individual members thereof, while lawfully carrying out its
legitimate objects.
2. Bona fide religious and charitable activities of any nonprofit
corporation, trust or organization established exclusively for
religious or charitable purposes.
3. Conduct which is expressly authorized, regulated or
approved by:
(a) A statute of this State or of the United States;
(b) An ordinance of any city or county of this State, except for
ordinances relating to video service providers; or
(c) An administrative agency of this State or of the United States
or of a city or county of this State, having jurisdiction of the subject
matter.
4. Conduct or agreements relating to rates, fares,
classifications, divisions, allowances or charges, including charges
between carriers and compensation paid or received for the use of
facilities and equipment, that are authorized, regulated or approved
-
*AB390*

– 25 –
by the Nevada Transportation Authority pursuant to chapter 706 of
NRS.
5. Restrictive covenants:
(a) Which are part of a contract of sale for a business and which
bar the seller of the business from competing with the purchaser of
the business sold within a reasonable market area for a reasonable
period of time; or
(b) Which are part of a commercial shopping center lease and
which bar the parties from permitting or engaging in the furnishing
of certain services or the sale of certain commodities within the
commercial shopping center where such leased premises are located.
6. Any conduct or agreement authorized by sections 13 to 35,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 52. The Legislative Counsel shall:
1. In preparing the reprint and supplements to the Nevada
Revised Statutes, appropriately change any references to an officer,
agency or other entity whose name is changed or whose
responsibilities are transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act
to refer to the appropriate officer, agency or other entity.
2. In preparing supplements to the Nevada Administrative
Code, appropriately change any references to an officer, agency or
other entity whose name is changed or whose responsibilities are
transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to refer to the
appropriate officer, agency or other entity.
Sec. 53. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
-
*AB390*

– 26 –
Sec. 54. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 53, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB390*